Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 6

Development District Correction Act

41-1-601. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Development District Correction Act.”

Acts 1989, ch. 484, § 1; T.C.A. § 41-1-701.

41-1-602. Establishment.

The commissioner of correction is authorized to designate certain institutions as regional state workhouses that may be operated by the department of correction to house prisoners sentenced to confinement for six (6) years or less.

Regional state workhouses may be established in one (1) or more development districts created pursuant to title 13, chapter 14.

The institutions shall be sufficiently secure to prevent the unauthorized absence by prisoners in the institutions.

Suitable living quarters shall be maintained and, where possible, the department should provide transportation to jobs and to vocational, educational or other programs in the community.

Acts 1989, ch. 484, § 2; T.C.A. § 41-1-702.

41-1-603. Designation of judicial districts — Maximum number of inmates.

The commissioner of correction may designate the judicial district or districts from which each regional workhouse may accept commitments.

The commissioner may further determine the number of inmates each institution may adequately house and may prorate the number among those judicial districts served by the institution. This prorated number shall be the maximum number of inmates committed from a given judicial district who may, without the commissioner's express approval, be housed in the institution at any one (1) time.

Acts 1989, ch. 484, § 3; T.C.A. § 41-1-703.

41-1-604. Advisory board.

The sheriff or sheriffs and district attorney general or district attorneys general or their designees of judicial districts designated in § 41-1-603 shall form an advisory board to periodically review the management and operation of the regional workhouses and to make recommendations to the commissioner relative to the management and operation of the facilities.

Acts 1989, ch. 484, § 4; T.C.A. § 41-1-704.

41-1-605. Manner of service of sentence — Application to alter.

Confinement in a regional workhouse shall be considered a sentence to the department; provided, that the court shall retain full jurisdiction over the defendant during the term of the sentence and may modify or reduce the sentence or may place the defendant on probation supervision where otherwise eligible.

Following the first application, applications to alter the manner of the service of the sentence may be made at no less than three (3) month intervals.

Acts 1989, ch. 484, § 5; T.C.A. § 41-1-705.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.